Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Equine Feed Assessment.

§ 3.2-1712.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Manufactured equine feed”
means a commercial feed as defined by §

3.2-4800

that is intended for consumption by horses or other equine.

“Manufacturer”
means any person who manufactures equine feed and is licensed to conduct business in the Commonwealth under §

3.2-4803

.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.67; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1713.
Petition for referendum on question of assessment; action of Board and Commissioner; amount of assessment.

The Board, upon a joint petition requesting a referendum being filed with it by at least three of the following: the Virginia Horse Council, Inc., the Virginia Thoroughbred Association, the Virginia Horse Shows Association, the Virginia Quarter Horse Association, the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, or the Virginia Agribusiness Council, and upon finding that sufficient interest exists among the members of the equine owners in the Commonwealth to justify a referendum, shall authorize the holding of a referendum as set forth in this article.

The Commissioner shall thereupon be fully empowered and directed to hold and conduct a referendum, in accordance with the provisions of §§

3.2-112

and

3.2-1705

, on the question of whether or not equine owners in the Commonwealth are of the opinion that additional market development, education, publicity, research, and promotion of the equine industry are required. If approved in the referendum authorized by this section, an assessment of $3 per ton or $0.075 per 50-pound bag of manufactured equine feed shall be established. The cost of conducting a referendum under this section shall be paid from the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.68; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1714.
Persons eligible to vote.

Any person who owns an equine in the Commonwealth shall be eligible to vote in a referendum held under this article if he executes and submits to the Commissioner an affidavit on forms and methods approved by the Board verifying Virginia residency, legal voting age, and at least one of the following to confirm equine ownership:

Current breed or discipline registration for an equine owned in the Commonwealth.

Receipt of a valid Virginia equine infectious anemia test within the last 12 months indicating an ownership interest in an equine.

A lease purchase agreement, contract, bill of sale, or other legal document showing current ownership or lease interest in an equine stabled or pastured in the Commonwealth.Completed forms shall include the full name of the person submitting the form along with an associated farm name, if applicable, mailing address, and phone number. Any person who is not an individual shall vote by its authorized representative.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.69; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1715.
Question to be printed on ballots.

The question to be printed on the ballots used in the initial referendum held pursuant to §

3.2-1713

, shall be as follows:

“Do you favor additional market development, education, publicity, research, and promotion of the Virginia equine industry and the levy of an assessment of $3 per ton or $0.075 per 50-pound bag of manufactured equine feed sold in the Commonwealth of Virginia in accordance with the provisions of the Horse Industry Board law?

_______________
Yes

_______________
No.”

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.70; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1716.
Action of Governor if a simple majority of voters favors assessment.

If the Governor finds the referendum in order and that at least a simple majority of those voting are in favor of the assessment for the purpose of conducting additional programs in market development, education, publicity, research, and promotion of the equine industry, he shall so proclaim and an assessment of $3 per ton or $0.075 per 50-pound bag of manufactured equine feed shall be established within 180 days of such proclamation and collected as set forth in this chapter.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.71; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1717.
Action of Governor if referendum found out of order or less than a simple majority of voters favors assessment.

If the Governor finds the referendum out of order, or that at least a simple majority of those voting are not in favor of the assessment for the purpose of conducting additional programs of market development, education, publicity, research, and promotion of the equine industry, he shall so proclaim and an assessment on manufactured equine feed shall not be established.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.72; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1718.
Referenda.

If the Governor issues a proclamation under §

3.2-1716

, then no other referendum shall be held on the equine industry that was the subject of the proclamation except that after the expiration of five years from the date of the imposition of the assessment on manufactured equine feed, another referendum may be held in the manner herein prescribed to determine whether the assessment shall be continued or adjusted. The Board, upon petition by members of the equine industry representing at least 10 percent of the number of members of the equine industry who voted in the preceding referendum, or as determined by the Commissioner, may provide for a referendum on the continuation or adjustment of the assessment. The Board shall not act on such a petition for conducting such a referendum until at least five years have passed from the time the manufactured equine feed assessment was established or until at least five years have passed since the last referendum.

If the Governor determines that a simple majority is not in favor of the assessment, the Board shall hold no new referendum for at least one year after the Governor has declared his findings, but, at the expiration of one year and upon petition by 10 percent of the members of the Commonwealth’s equine industry that voted in the most recent referendum, the Board may provide for a referendum. The cost of conducting any referendum under this section may be paid from the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.73; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1719.
Collection and disposition of assessment by manufacturer; report.

Every manufacturer shall collect an assessment of $3 per ton or $0.075 per 50-pound bag of manufactured equine feed he sells in the Commonwealth and on any manufactured equine feed he imports for sale in the Commonwealth and shall remit such assessment to the Department annually. The Department shall promptly pay the assessments into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund.

Every manufacturer shall complete, on forms furnished by the Department, an annual report of the total tonnage of manufactured equine feed he sold and imported into the Commonwealth. Such reports shall be submitted to the Department along with the assessments submitted pursuant to subsection A. The reporting year for manufactured equine feed shall be January 1 through December 31.

All assessments collected under this section shall be paid to the Department by February 1 for the preceding calendar year.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.74; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1720.
Records to be kept by manufacturer.

Any manufacturer who is required to collect the equine feed assessment under this article shall maintain such records as may be necessary or required by the Commissioner to accurately indicate the tonnage of manufactured equine feed that he has sold or imported for sale in the Commonwealth. The manufacturer shall maintain such records for a period of not less than three years from the time the manufactured equine feed was sold. Such records shall be open to the inspection of the Commissioner.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.75; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1721.
Collection of delinquent assessments; civil action.

Any manufacturer who is required to collect the equine feed assessment under this article and who has not paid the assessment to the Commissioner within 15 working days following the due date of February 1 shall pay to the Commissioner a late fee of 10 percent of the amount due or $50, whichever is greater, in addition to the amount of assessment owed. The appraisal of this late fee shall not prevent the Commissioner from taking other action, as provided for in this chapter. If any person is delinquent in any payment of the money due, then the amount shall be collected by civil action in the name of the Commonwealth at the direction of the Commissioner, and any person adjudged to be in default shall pay the cost of such action. The Attorney General, at the request of the Commissioner, shall institute action in any appropriate court for the collection of any money due, including interest thereon.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.76; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1722.
Falsification of records; misdemeanor.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor:

For any manufacturer to fail to submit to the Department any report required pursuant to §

3.2-1719

within 60 days after the time such report is due.

For any manufacturer knowingly to report falsely to the Department any information required pursuant to this article.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.77; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.